Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.530

Relating capital expenditure projects to comprehensive plan.

The planning agency shall list all such matters referred to in RCW 36.70.520 and shall prepare for and submit a report to the board which report shall set forth how each proposed project relates to all other proposed projects on the list and to all features in the comprehensive plan both as to location and timing. The planning agency shall report to the board through the planning director if there be such.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.530. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 53.]